Illinois, session 104th, SB1012.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Native American Gaming Compact Act is 5amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (230 ILCS 35/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Native American Gaming Compact Act.9(Source: P.A. 93-1051, eff. 1-1-05.)